Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-332
Violation; penalty.

The intentional and knowing violation of section 28-329, 28-330, or 28-331 is a Class IV felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 47;

Laws 1984, LB 695, § 7.